Utah statutes.
62A-15-619.   Liability of estate of mentally ill person.

The provisions made in this part for the support of mentally ill persons at public expense do not release the estates of those persons from liability for their care and treatment, and the division is authorized and empowered to collect from the estates of those persons any sums paid by the state in their behalf.

